dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
SFX A Y 411
SFX A   er    a           [^cg]er
SFX A   er    ai          [^cg]er
SFX A   er    aient       [^cg]er
SFX A   er    ais         [^cg]er
SFX A   er    ait         [^cg]er
SFX A   er    ant         [^cg]er
SFX A   er    as          [^cg]er
SFX A   er    asse        [^cg]er
SFX A   er    assent      [^cg]er
SFX A   er    asses       [^cg]er
SFX A   er    assiez      [^cg]er
SFX A   er    assions     [^cg]er
SFX A   er    e           [^cdghlmnprstuvy]er
SFX A   er    ent         [^cdghlmnprstuvy]er
SFX A   er    era         [^cdlmnprstvy]er
SFX A   er    erai        [^cdlmnprstvy]er
SFX A   er    eraient     [^cdlmnprstvy]er
SFX A   er    erais       [^cdlmnprstvy]er
SFX A   er    erait       [^cdlmnprstvy]er
SFX A   er    eras        [^cdlmnprstvy]er
SFX A   er    erez        [^cdlmnprstvy]er
SFX A   er    eriez       [^cdlmnprstvy]er
SFX A   er    erions      [^cdlmnprstvy]er
SFX A   er    erons       [^cdlmnprstvy]er
SFX A   er    eront       [^cdlmnprstvy]er
SFX A   er    es          [^cdghlmnprstuvy]er
SFX A   er    ez          er
SFX A   er    iez         er
SFX A   er    ions        er
SFX A   er    ons         [^cg]er
SFX A   er    âmes        [^cg]er
SFX A   er    ât          [^cg]er
SFX A   er    âtes        [^cg]er
SFX A   er    èrent       er
SFX A   er    é           er
SFX A   er    ée          er
SFX A   er    ées         er
SFX A   er    és          er
SFX A   cer   ça          cer
SFX A   cer   çai         cer
SFX A   cer   çaient      cer
SFX A   cer   çais        cer
SFX A   cer   çait        cer
SFX A   cer   çant        cer
SFX A   cer   ças         cer
SFX A   cer   çasse       cer
SFX A   cer   çassent     cer
SFX A   cer   çasses      cer
SFX A   cer   çassiez     cer
SFX A   cer   çassions    cer
SFX A   cer   çons        cer
SFX A   cer   çâmes       cer
SFX A   cer   çât         cer
SFX A   cer   çâtes       cer
SFX A   ger   gea         ger
SFX A   ger   geai        ger
SFX A   ger   geaient     ger
SFX A   ger   geais       ger
SFX A   ger   geait       ger
SFX A   ger   geant       ger
SFX A   ger   geas        ger
SFX A   ger   geasse      ger
SFX A   ger   geassent    ger
SFX A   ger   geasses     ger
SFX A   ger   geassiez    ger
SFX A   ger   geassions   ger
SFX A   ger   geons       ger
SFX A   ger   geâmes      ger
SFX A   ger   geât        ger
SFX A   ger   geâtes      ger
SFX A   ger   ge          [^é]ger
SFX A   ger   gent        [^é]ger
SFX A   ger   ges         [^é]ger
SFX A   éger  ège         éger
SFX A   éger  ègent       éger
SFX A   éger  èges        éger
SFX A   er    e           ayer
SFX A   er    ent         ayer
SFX A   er    era         ayer
SFX A   er    erai        ayer
SFX A   er    eraient     ayer
SFX A   er    erais       ayer
SFX A   er    erait       ayer
SFX A   er    eras        ayer
SFX A   er    erez        ayer
SFX A   er    eriez       ayer
SFX A   er    erions      ayer
SFX A   er    erons       ayer
SFX A   er    eront       ayer
SFX A   er    es          ayer
SFX A   yer   ie          [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   ient        [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   iera        [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   ierai       [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   ieraient    [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   ierais      [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   ierait      [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   ieras       [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   ierez       [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   ieriez      [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   ierions     [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   ierons      [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   ieront      [aou]yer
SFX A   yer   ies         [aou]yer
SFX A   er    e           eyer
SFX A   er    ent         eyer
SFX A   er    era         eyer
SFX A   er    erai        eyer
SFX A   er    eraient     eyer
SFX A   er    erais       eyer
SFX A   er    erait       eyer
SFX A   er    eras        eyer
SFX A   er    erez        eyer
SFX A   er    eriez       eyer
SFX A   er    erions      eyer
SFX A   er    erons       eyer
SFX A   er    eront       eyer
SFX A   er    es          eyer
SFX A   er    e           [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    ent         [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    era         [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    erai        [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    eraient     [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    erais       [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    erait       [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    eras        [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    erez        [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    eriez       [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    erions      [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    erons       [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    eront       [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    es          [^eé][cdmpstv]er
SFX A   er    e           [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    ent         [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    era         [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    erai        [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    eraient     [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    erais       [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    erait       [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    eras        [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    erez        [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    eriez       [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    erions      [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    erons       [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    eront       [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    es          [^eég][ln]er
SFX A   er    e           [^é]g[ln]er
SFX A   er    ent         [^é]g[ln]er
SFX A   er    era         g[ln]er
SFX A   er    erai        g[ln]er
SFX A   er    eraient     g[ln]er
SFX A   er    erais       g[ln]er
SFX A   er    erait       g[ln]er
SFX A   er    eras        g[ln]er
SFX A   er    erez        g[ln]er
SFX A   er    eriez       g[ln]er
SFX A   er    erions      g[ln]er
SFX A   er    erons       g[ln]er
SFX A   er    eront       g[ln]er
SFX A   er    es          [^é]g[ln]er
SFX A   er    e           [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    ent         [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    era         [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    erai        [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    eraient     [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    erais       [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    erait       [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    eras        [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    erez        [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    eriez       [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    erions      [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    erons       [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    eront       [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    es          [^eébcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    e           [^eé][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    ent         [^eé][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    era         [^e][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    erai        [^e][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    eraient     [^e][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    erais       [^e][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    erait       [^e][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    eras        [^e][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    erez        [^e][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    eriez       [^e][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    erions      [^e][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    erons       [^e][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    eront       [^e][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    es          [^eé][bcgtv]rer
SFX A   er    e           [^c]her
SFX A   er    ent         [^c]her
SFX A   er    es          [^c]her
SFX A   er    e           [^é]cher
SFX A   er    ent         [^é]cher
SFX A   er    es          [^é]cher
SFX A   er    e           [^gq]uer
SFX A   er    ent         [^gq]uer
SFX A   er    es          [^gq]uer
SFX A   er    e           [^é][gq]uer
SFX A   er    ent         [^é][gq]uer
SFX A   er    es          [^é][gq]uer
SFX A   er    le          eler
SFX A   er    lent        eler
SFX A   er    lera        eler
SFX A   er    lerai       eler
SFX A   er    leraient    eler
SFX A   er    lerais      eler
SFX A   er    lerait      eler
SFX A   er    leras       eler
SFX A   er    lerez       eler
SFX A   er    leriez      eler
SFX A   er    lerions     eler
SFX A   er    lerons      eler
SFX A   er    leront      eler
SFX A   er    les         eler
SFX A   er    te          eter
SFX A   er    tent        eter
SFX A   er    tera        eter
SFX A   er    terai       eter
SFX A   er    teraient    eter
SFX A   er    terais      eter
SFX A   er    terait      eter
SFX A   er    teras       eter
SFX A   er    terez       eter
SFX A   er    teriez      eter
SFX A   er    terions     eter
SFX A   er    terons      eter
SFX A   er    teront      eter
SFX A   er    tes         eter
