dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.dic
aboucher/ANPT
absenter/AP
acclamer/A
accoter/ANPT
acculer/A
activer/AR
admirer/A
affamer/A
affoler/A
agripper/A
ajuster/AR
alterner/A
amenuiser/A
améliorer/A
annoncer/A
appliquer/A
appréhender/A
arracher/A
asperger/A
assumer/AR
attirer/A
augurer/A
avantager/A
axer/A
balayer/A
baptiser/ADR
berner/A
blâmer/A
boucler/AD
brader/A
brider/AD
brouter/A
bâcler/AD
cabrer/A
calfeutrer/A
camper/AD
capter/A
caresser/A
catalyser/A
centraliser/AD
chaperonner/AD
chavirer/A
choquer/A
cintrer/AD
clarifier/A
clôturer/A
coiffer/ADR
colleter/AD
commander/ADR
complexer/AD
compulser/A
condenser/A
confisquer/A
conjecturer/A
consigner/AD
consumer/A
contre-attaquer/A
conventionner/AD
corriger/AR
courber/AR
crier/AD
crécher/A
créosoter/A
culer/AR
daigner/AD
diagnostiquer/A
diminuer/A
dispenser/A
disséminer/A
divulguer/A
dramatiser/AD
déboucher/A
déchirer/A
découcher/A
dédouaner/A
défeutrer/A
défouler/A
dégainer/A
dégonfler/A
dégraisser/A
déguiser/A
déjeter/A
délarder/A
délimiter/A
démagnétiser/A
démastiquer/A
démissionner/A
démotiver/A
déménager/A
déneiger/A
dénoncer/A
dépanner/A
dépayser/A
dépister/A
déployer/A
déposer/A
déprolétariser/A
dérager/A
dérober/A
désabuser/A
désavantager/A
déshabiller/A
désintéresser/A
déstructurer/A
détaxer/A
détourner/A
détrôner/A
déverser/A
dévolter/A
effleurer/A
embrancher/A
empaqueter/A
empoisonner/A
enamourer/ANP
encoller/A
endosser/A
enfumer/A
enjamber/A
enregistrer/AR
ensorceler/A
entraver/A
entêter/A
escompter/AR
essouffler/A
exciter/A
expatrier/A
exprimer/A
extorquer/A
fabuler/A
fausser/AD
feutrer/AD
filer/ADR
folâtrer/A
formuler/A
frapper/A
froncer/AD
fusionner/A
galvaniser/A
gausser/A
gifler/A
gonfler/ADR
graduer/A
gribouiller/A
grogner/A
générer/AD
hanter/A
hisser/A
huer/A
hypnotiser/A
imbiber/A
implanter/AR
impulser/A
incliner/A
indigner/A
influencer/A
initier/A
inspecter/A
intensifier/A
interroger/A
invalider/A
irriter/A
jouer/ADR
kidnapper/A
l'utiliser/A
l'ébouriffer/A
l'écanguer/A
l'échopper/A
l'écroûter/A
l'éfaufiler/A
l'électrocuter/A
l'émasculer/A
l'épamprer/A
l'épointer/A
l'érotiser/A
l'étoiler/A
l'étêter/A
lacérer/A
lasser/AD
libérer/AD
limiter/AD
localiser/A
m'adresser/A
m'ébouler/A
m'écacher/A
m'échauder/A
m'écornifler/A
m'écœurer/A
m'égriser/A
m'éliminer/A
m'émotter/A
m'épaufrer/A
m'épouiller/A
m'établer/A
m'étriller/A
m'éventer/A
mander/A
manutentionner/A
marrer/AD
maugréer/A
merder/AD
minorer/A
moderniser/A
monétiser/AD
mouiller/AR
mystifier/AD
ménager/ASX
n'ébavurer/A
n'ébouter/A
n'échalasser/A
n'écloper/A
n'écroûter/A
n'éfaufiler/A
n'éjointer/A
n'émanciper/A
n'émousser/A
n'épeurer/A
n'épépiner/A
n'étamer/A
n'étriller/A
n'éventer/A
nationaliser/AD
nitrifier/AD
noyauter/AD
obliger/A
occuper/AR
orchestrer/AR
outrepasser/A
panacher/A
parasiter/AD
parler/AS
patronner/A
pelleter/A
permuter/A
persévérer/A
piller/A
pister/AD
plier/ADR
poinçonner/A
poncer/A
postdater/A
presser/A
privilégier/A
promulguer/A
protester/A
préfacer/A
préposer/A
prôner/A
qualifier/AD
rabaisser/A
radicaliser/A
raisonner/AD
ranger/AD
rassurer/A
ravager/A
recenser/A
relater/A
remporter/A
rengager/A
renverser/A
respirer/A
restructurer/A
retercer/A
retrancher/A
retâter/A
revoler/A
ristourner/A
ruer/A
réceptionner/A
récuser/A
régionaliser/A
répercuter/A
résigner/A
réunifier/A
réédifier/A
s'ébouillanter/A
s'émanciper/A
sabrer/A
sanctionner/A
scandaliser/A
sculpter/A
siffler/A
soigner/A
sonner/A
sous-estimer/A
spécialiser/A
stocker/AD
subordonner/A
suicider/A
supposer/A
surmonter/A
syndiquer/A
t'ébouler/A
t'écacher/A
t'échauder/A
t'écornifler/A
t'écœurer/A
t'égriser/A
t'éliminer/A
t'émotter/A
t'éperonner/A
t'époustoufler/A
t'étamer/A
t'étriper/A
t'éventrer/A
taper/AR
tercer/AR
thésauriser/A
tonifier/A
tourner/ADR
transborder/A
transvaser/A
tricoter/AD
trouver/AR
télédiffuser/A
urbaniser/A
vautrer/A
vexer/A
visionner/A
volter/AD
ébaucher/A
ébourrer/ANT
écaler/ANPT
écharner/ANT
échouer/A
écornifler/ANT
écrivasser/AN
édicter/A
égayer/A
éjecter/A
élimer/ANPT
émasculer/ANT
émotter/ANT
épanner/ANT
épiler/A
épurer/A
ériger/A
étamper/ANT
étriller/ANT
évincer/A
